Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
Closing of State Parks

§ 55-3-101.
Authority of Governor to close state parks.

As supplemental to and in addition to all other power and authority which may now be vested in the Governor of the State of Mississippi by the constitution or statutes, or both, or any power or authority which may be vested in him by common law as Governor, as such, the Governor of the State of Mississippi is hereby vested with the authority to close any or all state parks in the State of Mississippi when, in his discretion, he determines such closure would be to the best interest of the county or counties in which any state park or parks may be situated, or whenever he so determines such to be to the best interest of the State of Mississippi. The said Governor, as such, is also vested with such supplemental and additional authority to close any or all state parks in the State of Mississippi when, in his discretion, he determines such closure will promote or preserve the public peace, order or tranquility of the county or counties in which such park or parks may be situated, or that such closure will promote or preserve the public peace, order or tranquility in and of the State of Mississippi.

The fact that the power and authority to close any or all of the state parks may be by some other statute of the State of Mississippi now or hereafter vested in some other person or officer or commission shall not cause this section and any other such law or laws to be in conflict nor shall same be construed to be in conflict with each other. Such power and authority vested in each such commission or person or officer, as the case may be, may be exercised by each or either, independent of any other such commission of person or persons or officer or officers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5963.6; Laws, 1958, ch. 194, §§ 1-6.

§ 55-3-103.
Proclamation as to closure; period of closure.

The decision or determination to close any or all of the state parks shall be effectuated and evidenced by a proclamation of the Governor of the State of Mississippi and which shall be effective upon his execution or issuance thereof. Such park or parks closed shall remain so closed until said Governor shall execute or issue a further proclamation opening same. The use by said governor of the power vested in him by the terms of Section 55-3-101 may be exercised from time to time, as, in his discretion, he may deem necessary for any or all of the purposes specified in said section. Any proclamation of closure need not specify the period of time during which such closure shall be effective.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5963.6; Laws, 1958, ch. 194, §§ 1-6.

§ 55-3-105.
Entry upon premises of closed park.

Upon the closure of any state park or parks, no person shall go or enter upon the premises thereof except with the permission or approval of said Governor. Any other person going or entering upon said premises shall be a trespasser and guilty of a misdemeanor under the laws of the State of Mississippi and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or both so fined and imprisoned.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5963.6; Laws, 1958, ch. 194, §§ 1-6.